Maine, session 132, LD2012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2468, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 322, §9, is further
amended to read:
4. New construction. A person who constructs any of the following shall install or
cause to be installed at least one carbon monoxide detector in each area within, or giving
access to, any bedroom in the new construction of:
A. A single-family dwelling;
B. A hotel, motel, inn or bed and breakfast upon initial licensure of that new
construction as an eating establishment or a lodging place under Title 22, chapter 562
on or after August 1, 2012; or
C. A fraternity house, sorority house or dormitory established on or after August 1,
2012 that is affiliated with a private or public school or private or public postsecondary
institution incorporated or chartered under the laws of this State.; or
D. Beginning January 1, 2027, in addition to the structures described in paragraphs A,
B and C, any occupancy for which the installation of carbon monoxide detectors is
required by the Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association as adopted
by the Commissioner of Public Safety.
The carbon monoxide detector must be powered both by the electrical service in the
building or dwelling and by battery.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2468, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 162, §5, is amended to
read:
7. Rules. The Commissioner of Public Safety or the commissioner's designee, in
accordance with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, shall may adopt rules pertaining
to carbon monoxide detectors. The rules adopted must include, but are not limited to,
standards for approved carbon monoxide detectors and all requirements of use,
maintenance and installation. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §2468, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2015, c. 396, §2, is further
amended to read:
11. Educational facilities. An educational facility shall install, or cause to be
installed, by the manufacturer's requirements at least one approved carbon monoxide
detector detectors by the manufacturer's requirements and in accordance with the
requirements of the Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association as adopted
by the Commissioner of Public Safety in each building of the educational facility that is
used for educational purposes by at least 6 persons for at least 4 hours per day or more than
12 hours per week. The owner shall use a carbon monoxide detector that is powered by:
A. Both the electrical service in the building and a battery;
B. A nonreplaceable 10-year battery; or
C. A replaceable battery if the carbon monoxide detector uses a low-power radio
frequency wireless communication signal, uses multiple sensors, has low-frequency
audible notification capability or is connected to a control panel.
Page 1 - 132LR2780(01)

Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §2468, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Enforcement. This section may be enforced by the Office of the State Fire
Marshal; a state, county or municipal law enforcement officer; a municipal code
enforcement officer; or a state, county or municipal fire inspector.